Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
LIFE AND DISABILITY

INSURANCE
GUARANTY ASSOCIATION

§431:16-201 Title. This part shall be
known as the Hawaii Life and Disability Insurance Guaranty Association Act. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next